Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-111
Township, precinct, defined.

The words township and precinct shall each include the other, and shall also include towns in counties under township organization.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 9, p. 390;

R.S.1913, § 6297;

Laws 1921, c. 133, art. I, § 10, p. 546;

C.S.1922, § 5817;

C.S.1929, § 77-110;

R.S.1943, § 77-111.